Utah statutes.
4-33-9.   Warrant to enter premises for inspection or sampling.

If admittance is refused to the department either for sampling or for inspection of transport invoices or bills of lading, the department may obtain an ex parte warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to allow entry upon the premises for the purpose of inspection or taking samples or to examine transport documents.

